District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1954

Reinstatement after leave without pay granted.

Repealed.

Oct. 29, 1951, 65 Stat. 661, ch. 601, § 5
Mar. 16, 1982, D.C. Law 4-78,§ 21, 29 DCR 49
1981 Ed., § 31-1022.
1973 Ed., § 31-691b.